Utah statutes.
31A-40-103.   Duties of the commissioner.

(1) (a)  The commissioner shall maintain a list of professional employer organizations that are licensed under this chapter.

(b)  The commissioner shall make the list required by this Subsection (1) available to the public by electronic or other means.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commissioner:

(a)  shall make rules to prescribe the requirements for forms required under this chapter; 

(b)  may make rules to prescribe the requirements and process for correcting under Section 31A-40-205:

(i)  a deficiency in working capital; or

(ii)  negative working capital;

(c)  may make rules to prescribe the requirements for the review and submission of a financial statement under Section 31A-40-305:

(i)  that are consistent with generally accepted accounting principles; and

(ii)  including the timeliness of a financial statement; and

(d)  may make rules to prescribe the requirements and process for when a professional employer organization license is terminated by:

(i)  voluntary surrender of the professional organization license; or

(ii)  involuntary surrender of the professional organization license.

(3)  A rule in effect on May 5, 2008 under the repealed Title 58, Chapter 59, Professional Employer Organization Registration Act, remains in effect until such time as the commissioner modifies or repeals the rule.



Amended by Chapter 10, 2010 General Session

